Nevada, session 83, SB402.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 22 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 11, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 3 to 6, inclusive,
of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Building restoration project” or “project” means a
project to improve, rehabilitate, repair, equip, maintain and
operate a building, and the site surrounding the building, if:
1. The building and the surrounding site are located, in
whole or in part, in the municipality creating a restoration
improvement district pursuant to section 7 of this act with respect
to the district;
2. The original structure of the building, excluding any
additions, is at least 50 years of age;
3. The owner of the building may hold a business license to
operate a business at the site of the building, whether or not the
owner holds such a license;
4. The building has not had any business operated at the site
for at least 10 years other than any operations necessary to
maintain a privileged license issued by a local government; and
5. As a result of the project, the building will be restored in a
manner consistent with the original character of the building.
Sec. 4. “Developer” means the person or entity that proposes
to undertake a building restoration project.
-
*SB402_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 5. “District” means a restoration improvement district
created pursuant to section 7 of this act.
Sec. 6. “Municipality” means any county or city in this State.
Sec. 7. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
governing body of a municipality may:
(a) Create a restoration improvement district for the purposes
of carrying out this chapter by adopting an ordinance describing
the boundaries of the district, which must be the geographic
boundaries of a building restoration project in the municipality,
and generally describing the purposes within the district for which
money pledged pursuant to this chapter may be used. An
ordinance adopted pursuant to this paragraph must include the
findings of the governing body of the municipality that the project
qualifies as a building restoration project.
(b) For the purposes of carrying out paragraph (a), include in
an ordinance adopted pursuant to that paragraph the pledge of the
proceeds of any taxes levied for a fiscal year upon taxable real
property in the district each year by or for the benefit of the State,
the municipality and any public body, in the amount determined
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 8 of this act.
2. Upon introduction of an ordinance to create a restoration
improvement district pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1,
the governing body of the municipality shall provide notice of the
introduction of the ordinance to the governing body of each public
body, other than the State, by or for the benefit of which any tax is
levied upon taxable real property in the district. Not later than 30
days after the receipt of such notice, the governing body of a
public body receiving such a notice may:
(a) Provide comments to the governing body of the
municipality introducing the ordinance concerning the creation of
the restoration improvement district; and
(b) Adopt a resolution to elect not to include any taxes levied
by or for the benefit of the public body in the pledge of the
proceeds of taxes levied upon taxable real property in the district,
which is proposed to be included in an ordinance adopted
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1. If, within 30 days after
receiving notice pursuant to this subsection the governing body of
a public body adopts such a resolution, the governing body must
send, by certified mail, notice of the adoption of the resolution to
the governing body of the municipality that introduced the
ordinance and the governing body of that municipality may not
include in the ordinance a pledge of any taxes levied for a fiscal
year upon taxable real property in the district each year by or for
the benefit of that public body.
-
*SB402_R1*

– 4 –
3. The governing body of a municipality shall not adopt an
ordinance pursuant to this section or create a restoration
improvement district for any building restoration project unless
the municipality has entered into a written deed restriction or
restrictive covenant with the developer of the project, and such
deed restriction or restrictive covenant has been properly and
validly recorded with the appropriate county recorder in the
county where the building restoration project is located. The
recorded deed restriction or restrictive covenant must restrict the
use of the building restoration project or any portion of the
building restoration project as follows:
(a) The written deed restriction or restrictive covenant must
include the developer of the building restoration project and the
municipality as parties to the document.
(b) The written deed restriction or restrictive covenant must
prohibit the building restoration project or any portion of the
building restoration project from conducting or operating a
nonrestricted operation, as defined in NRS 463.0177, on all or any
portion of the building restoration project that requires or would
require a nonrestricted license, as defined in NRS 463.0177, for a
period of at least 20 years from the date of the ordinance or the
creation of the district, whichever date is later.
(c) The written deed restriction or restrictive covenant shall be
a covenant running with the land for the benefit of the
municipality and shall be binding on the successors and assigns of
the building restoration project and the municipality.
(d) No party to the written deed restriction or restrictive
covenant shall alter, amend, revoke or terminate the deed
restriction or restrictive covenant for a period of at least 20
continuous years after the adoption of the ordinance or creation of
the district, whichever date is later. After that time period, any
alteration, amendment, revocation or termination of the deed
restriction or restrictive covenant shall require the affirmative vote
of the governing body of the municipality creating the district.
4. A restoration improvement district may not include any
property that is, at the time the boundaries of the restoration
improvement district are created, included within a redevelopment
area previously established pursuant to the laws of this State.
5. A restoration improvement district may not include any
parcel or parcels of land, building or group of buildings or spaces
that include or will include an establishment, as defined in NRS
463.0148, that holds a nonrestricted gaming license, as defined in
NRS 463.0177, whether the license is held by the owner, lessor or
lessee of the building restoration project or a third party licensed
by the Nevada Gaming Commission to operate gaming devices, as
-
*SB402_R1*

– 5 –
defined in NRS 463.0155, or games as defined NRS 463.0152, on
a continuous or periodic basis.
6. A district created pursuant to this section by:
(a) A city must be located entirely within the boundaries of
that city.
(b) A county must be located entirely within the boundaries of
that county and, when the district is created, entirely outside of the
boundaries of any city.
Sec. 8. 1. After the effective date of an ordinance adopted
pursuant to section 7 of this act, any taxes levied upon the taxable
real property in the district each year by or for the benefit of the
State, the municipality and any public body must be divided as
follows:
(a) That portion of the taxes that would be produced by the
rate upon which the tax is levied each year by or for each of those
taxing agencies upon the total sum of the assessed value of the
taxable real property in the district as shown upon the last
equalized assessment roll used in connection with the taxation of
the real property by the taxing agency, must be allocated to and
when collected must be paid into the funds of the respective taxing
agencies as taxes by or for the taxing agencies on all other real
property are paid.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the portion of
the taxes levied on taxable real property each year in excess of the
amount determined pursuant to paragraph (a) must be allocated
to, and when collected must be paid into, the restoration
improvement district account pertaining to the project to pay
money pledged pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of
section 7 of this act. Unless the total assessed valuation of the
taxable real property in the restoration improvement district
exceeds the total assessed value of the taxable real property in the
district as shown by the last equalized assessment roll referred to
in this subsection, all of the taxes levied and collected upon the
taxable real property in the district must be paid into the funds of
the respective taxing agencies. When all payments required by any
agreement entered into pursuant to section 10 of this act have
been paid, all money thereafter received from taxes upon the
taxable real property in the restoration improvement district must
be paid into the funds of the respective taxing agencies as taxes on
all other real property are paid.
2. The portion of the taxes levied each year in excess of the
amount determined pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
which is attributable to any tax rate levied by a taxing agency:
(a) To produce revenue in an amount sufficient to make
annual repayments of the principal of, and the interest on, any
-
*SB402_R1*

– 6 –
bonded indebtedness that was approved by a majority of the
registered voters within the area of the taxing agency voting upon
the question, must be allocated to, and when collected must be
paid into, the debt service fund of that taxing agency.
(b) In excess of any tax rate of that taxing agency applicable to
the last taxation of the real property before the effective date of the
ordinance, if that additional rate was approved by a majority of the
registered voters within the area of the taxing agency voting upon
the question, must be allocated to, and when collected must be
paid into, the appropriate fund of that taxing agency.
(c) Pursuant to NRS 387.3285 or 387.3287, if that rate was
approved by a majority of the registered voters within the area of
the taxing agency voting upon the question, must be allocated to,
and when collected must be paid into, the appropriate fund of that
taxing agency.
(d) For the support of the public schools within a county
school district pursuant to NRS 387.195, must be allocated to, and
when collected must be paid into, the State Education Fund.
(e) For which the governing body of the taxing agency has
adopted a resolution pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of
section 7 of this act electing not to pledge the taxes levied by the
taxing agency, must be allocated to, and when collected must be
paid into, the appropriate fund of that taxing agency.
3. The provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 include,
without limitation, a tax rate approved for bonds of a county
school district issued pursuant to NRS 350.020, including, without
limitation, amounts necessary for a reserve account in the debt
service fund.
4. As used in this section, the term “last equalized assessment
roll” means the assessment roll in existence on the 15th day of
March immediately preceding the effective date of the ordinance.
Sec. 9. The allowed revenue from taxes ad valorem
determined pursuant to NRS 354.59811 does not apply to a district
created pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 10. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if
the governing body of a municipality adopts an ordinance
pursuant to section 7 of this act, the municipality may enter into
an agreement with the developer of the building restoration
project for the cost of improving, rehabilitating, repairing,
equipping, maintaining or operating, or any combination thereof,
the project, which may contain such terms as are determined to be
desirable by the governing body of the municipality, including the
payment of reasonable interest and other financing costs for the
project. Any such reimbursements may be secured by a pledge of,
and be payable from, any money pledged pursuant to section 7 of
-
*SB402_R1*

– 7 –
this act and received with respect to the district. If such an
agreement is entered into, the agreement must provide for an
annual payment to the developer of the money pledged pursuant to
section 7 of this act and received by the municipality not later than
15 days after the date for such an annual payment specified in the
agreement. An agreement entered into pursuant to this section is
not subject to the limitations of subsection 1 of NRS 354.626 and
may, at the option of the governing body, be binding on the
municipality beyond the fiscal year in which it was made, only if
the agreement pertains solely to the project.
2. No agreement entered into pursuant to this section may be
secured by or payable from the general fund of the municipality,
the power of the municipality to levy ad valorem property taxes, or
any source other than any money pledged pursuant to section 7 of
this act and received by the municipality with respect to the
district, or any combination thereof. No agreement entered into
pursuant to this section may ever become a general obligation of
the municipality or a charge against its general credit or taxing
powers, nor may any such agreement become a debt of the
municipality for purposes of any limitation on indebtedness.
3. Any agreement entered pursuant to this section
automatically terminates at the end of the fiscal year in which the
20th anniversary of the adoption of the ordinance creating the
district occurs.
Sec. 11. The provisions of NRS 338.013 to 338.090,
inclusive, apply to any construction work related to a building
restoration project performed after the effective date of an
ordinance creating a district adopted pursuant to section 7 of this
act with respect to the project, under a contract awarded or an
agreement entered into with respect to the project, whether or not
the contract was awarded or the agreement was entered into on or
after the effective date of that ordinance. If, pursuant to this
subsection, the provisions of NRS 338.013 to 338.090, inclusive,
are applicable, the governing body, the developer, any contractor
who is awarded such a contract or enters into such an agreement
to perform the construction work and any subcontractor who
performs any portion of the construction work related to such a
project shall comply with the provisions of NRS 338.013 to
338.090, inclusive, in the same manner as if the governing body
had undertaken the project or had awarded the contract.
Sec. 12. NRS 354.59811 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
354.59811 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 244.377,
278C.260, 354.59813, 354.59815, 354.59818, 354.5982, 354.5987,
354.705, 354.723, 450.425, 450.760, 540A.265 and 543.600, and
-
*SB402_R1*

– 8 –
section 9 of this act, for each fiscal year beginning on or after
July 1, 1989, the maximum amount of money that a local
government, except a school district, a district to provide a
telephone number for emergencies or a redevelopment agency, may
receive from taxes ad valorem, other than those attributable to the
net proceeds of minerals or those levied for the payment of bonded
indebtedness and interest thereon incurred as general long-term debt
of the issuer, or for the payment of obligations issued to pay the cost
of a water project pursuant to NRS 349.950, or for the payment of
obligations under a capital lease executed before April 30, 1981,
must be calculated as follows:
(a) The rate must be set so that when applied to the current fiscal
year’s assessed valuation of all property which was on the preceding
fiscal year’s assessment roll, together with the assessed valuation of
property on the central assessment roll which was allocated to the
local government, but excluding any assessed valuation attributable
to the net proceeds of minerals, assessed valuation attributable to a
redevelopment area and assessed valuation of a fire protection
district attributable to real property which is transferred from private
ownership to public ownership for the purpose of conservation, it
will produce 106 percent of the maximum revenue allowable from
taxes ad valorem for the preceding fiscal year, except that the rate so
determined must not be less than the rate allowed for the previous
fiscal year, except for any decrease attributable to the imposition of
a tax pursuant to NRS 354.59813 in the previous year.
(b) This rate must then be applied to the total assessed valuation,
excluding the assessed valuation attributable to the net proceeds of
minerals and the assessed valuation of a fire protection district
attributable to real property which is transferred from private
ownership to public ownership for the purpose of conservation, but
including new real property, possessory interests and mobile homes,
for the current fiscal year to determine the allowed revenue from
taxes ad valorem for the local government.
2. As used in this section, “general long-term debt” does not
include debt created for medium-term obligations pursuant to NRS
350.087 to 350.095, inclusive.
Sec. 13. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
H
-
*SB402_R1*